District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.01

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited to as the “Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of 2005”.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2301, 52 DCR 7503
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(a), 61 DCR 3892

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-301.181, § 2-214.01, § 2-351.01, § 2-352.02, § 2-354.12, § 2-359.07, § 10-801, § 47-4630, and § 47-4635.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108 substituted “Small and Certified” for “Small, Local and Disadvantaged.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108: Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108(b) provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.